Maryland, session 2025, SB0309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
– 1 –

Ch. 269 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS:
(1) AN ACTIVE DUTY MEMBER OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES; OR
(2) SERVING IN A RESERVE COMPONENT OF THE UNIFORMED
SERVICES ON ACTIVE DUTY ORDERS.
(D) “ARMED FORCES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 10 U.S.C. § 101.
[(b)] (E) “Board” means the Board of Trustees of the Maryland Veterans Trust.
[(c)] (F) “Department” means the Department of Veterans and Military
Families.
(G) “MILITARY FAMILY” INCLUDES THE SPOUSE AND DEPENDENT
CHILDREN OF A SERVICE MEMBER OR VETERAN RELATED BY BLOOD, MARRIAGE, OR
ADOPTION.
(H) (D) “RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C.
§ 101.
[(d)] (I) (E) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Veterans and Military Families.
(J) (F) “SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A MEMBER OF:
(1) THE UNIFORMED SERVICES; OR
(2) A RESERVE COMPONENT OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES.
[(e)] (K) (G) “Trust” means the Maryland Veterans Trust.
(L) (H) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C.
§ 101.
[(f)] (M) (I) Except as otherwise provided [in this subtitle], “veteran” [means an
individual who served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, other than
for training, and was discharged or released under conditions other than dishonorable] HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN 38 U.S.C. § 101.
9–940.
(a) In this part, “Program” means the Communications, Outreach, and Advocacy
Program.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 269
(b) There is a Communications, Outreach, and Advocacy Program in the
Department.
(c) The purpose of the Program is to ensure that:
(1) veterans, SERVICE MEMBERS, AND THEIR FAMILIES are informed of
the services, benefits, and assistance available to them from the State and federal
government and community organizations; and
(2) general issues relating to veterans’, SERVICE MEMBERS’, AND THEIR
FAMILIES’ needs are brought to the attention of the Governor and the General Assembly
in order for them to be addressed.
9–942.
(a) The Program shall actively help veterans, SERVICE MEMBERS, and their
dependents become aware of and access any service or benefit to which they are entitled
including:
(1) tax benefits;
(2) health care benefits;
(3) disability benefits; and
(4) pension benefits.
(b) The Program, in collaboration with the Maryland Higher Education
Commission, shall actively help veterans, SERVICE MEMBERS, and their dependents
become aware of and access education and training benefits to which they are entitled.
(c) The director of the Program shall:
(1) support veterans, SERVICE MEMBERS, and their dependents through
the service or benefit process; and
(2) refer veterans, [veterans’] SERVICE MEMBERS, THEIR dependents,
and [veterans’] THEIR survivors to the appropriate governmental unit for claim assistance.
9–943.
(a) (1) For the purposes of reaching any veteran, [veteran’s] SERVICE
MEMBER, dependent OF A VETERAN OR SERVICE MEMBER, or [veteran’s] survivor OF A
VETERAN OR SERVICE MEMBER in need of assistance in obtaining services or benefits
granted by the law, the director shall develop and implement a communications and
outreach plan.
– 3 –

Ch. 269 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) In order to carry out the director’s responsibilities under paragraph (1)
of this subsection, the director may:
(i) enter into contracts; and
(ii) work with governmental units and community–based
organizations, including the Maryland Department of Health, the Department of Aging,
faith–based groups, veterans groups, senior centers, adult day care centers, institutions of
higher education, and other entities the director considers appropriate.
(b) (1) The director shall develop mechanisms for outreach to be disseminated
by direct mail and through community–based veterans organizations, the Department, the
Department of Human Services, the Maryland Department of Health, and any other State
agency or unit the director considers appropriate.
(2) Communication mechanisms shall include:
(i) designing marketing materials describing the services provided
by the Program;
(ii) a regular electronic newsletter;
(iii) brochures describing various benefits or any other issue or
benefit of interest to veterans, SERVICE MEMBERS, or their dependents; and
(iv) other measures the director considers appropriate.
(c) The Department shall communicate welcome home information to veterans
AND SERVICE MEMBERS returning to the State.
(d) The Department, in conjunction with the types of community–based
organizations listed in subsection (a)(2) of this section, shall develop communication tools
to assist in identifying veterans, SERVICE MEMBERS, and dependents who may be eligible
for benefits and programs offered by the Department.
(e) The Program shall:
(1) manage the Maryland Veterans Service Animal Program and Fund
established under Part VIII of this subtitle;
(2) coordinate the responsibilities of veterans’ services specialists
designated under § 9–944 of this subtitle; and
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 269
(3) manage Department media relations, web content, social media,
internal and external communications, customer service training, and intergovernmental
relations.
(f) The director shall serve, as necessary, as the Secretary’s designee to
appropriate commissions, workgroups, and councils.
9–945.
(A) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2025, THE PROGRAM SHALL ESTABLISH
AND MAINTAIN AN ONLINE REGISTRY TO PROVIDE INFORMATION TO REGISTERED
INDIVIDUALS.
(B) THE REGISTRY SHALL:
(1) ALLOW AN INDIVIDUAL TO REGISTER;
(2) PROVIDE REGISTERED INDIVIDUALS INFORMATION, INCLUDING
AVAILABLE SERVICES, BENEFITS, AND NEWS THAT IMPACTS VETERANS, SERVICE
MEMBERS, MILITARY FAMILIES, AND OTHER INTERESTED INDIVIDUALS;
(3) ALLOW A REGISTERED INDIVIDUAL TO UPDATE THEIR ONLINE
REGISTRY INFORMATION INCLUDING THE INDIVIDUAL’S NAME, E–MAIL ADDRESS,
AND OPTIONAL STATUSES; AND
(4) HAVE THE CAPABILITY TO IMPORT SHAREABLE REGISTRATION
DATA PROVIDED BY OTHER AUTHORIZED UNITS OF STATE GOVERNMENT.
(C) THE PROGRAM:
(1) SHALL REQUIRE AN INDIVIDUAL REGISTERING WITH THE ONLINE
REGISTRY TO PROVIDE THE INDIVIDUAL’S NAME AND EMAIL ADDRESS; AND
(2) SHALL REQUEST THAT AN INDIVIDUAL REGISTERING WITH THE
ONLINE REGISTRY PROVIDE THE FOLLOWING OPTIONAL STATUS INFORMATION:
(I) WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL IS A VETERAN;
(II) WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL IS CURRENTLY ON ACTIVE
DUTY;
(III) WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL IS A MEMBER OF:
1. THE UNIFORMED SERVICES;
– 5 –

Ch. 269 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. A RESERVE COMPONENT; OR
3. THE MARYLAND DEFENSE FORCE; AND
(IV) IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS NOT A VETERAN OR MEMBER AS
DESCRIBED IN ITEM (III) OF THIS ITEM, WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL IS:
1. A SPOUSE OF A MEMBER OR VETERAN;
2. A DEPENDENT CHILD OF A MEMBER OR VETERAN; OR
3. ANY OTHER INTERESTED INDIVIDUAL.
9–946.
The Secretary shall submit a report by December 31 of each year to the Governor
and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of this article, the General Assembly, that includes:
(7) the status of federal veterans programs as they relate to Maryland
veterans; [and]
(8) A REPORT ON THE ONLINE REGISTRY INCLUDING:
(I) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS ON THE REGISTRY;
(II) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS ON THE REGISTRY LISTED BY
STATUSES, INCLUDING THOSE WITH AN UNDECLARED STATUS;
(III) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS ADDED TO THE REGISTRY IN
THE PREVIOUS YEAR; AND
(IV) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS THAT UNSUBSCRIBED OR
WERE REMOVED FROM THE REGISTRY IN THE PREVIOUS YEAR; AND
(8) A GENERAL ASSESSMENT OF COMMUNICATION METHODS
UTILIZED IN SUPPORT OF THE COMMUNICATIONS, OUTREACH, AND ADVOCACY
PROGRAM; AND
[(8)] (9) any other issues concerning veterans that the Secretary
considers appropriate.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 269
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 7 –